Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1359.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Statewide Hyperscale Data Center Moratorium Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Hyperscale data center." As follows:(1) A retail electric customer facility that:(i) is used primarily or exclusively for electronic information services such as the management, storage, processing and dissemination of electronic data and information through the use of computer systems, servers, networking equipment and related components; and123456789101112131415161718 (ii) has an aggregate monthly maximum demand of either of the following minimum thresholds:(A) for an electric distribution company whose peak load is equal to or above 2,500 megawatts, 20 megawatts; or(B) for an electric distribution company whose peak load is less than 2,500 megawatts, one megawatt.(2) For the purpose of calculating the aggregate minimum thresholds under paragraph (1):(i) The sum of all load of the retail electric customer's affiliated companies and companies with common ownership shall be included.(ii) If there are multiple facilities at a single location of less than the applicable minimum thresholds, but the aggregate total load is greater than the minimum thresholds, all the multiple facilities shall be included.Section 3. Moratorium(a) Imposition.--A moratorium is imposed on:(1) The development or permitting of any new construction or expansion of a hyperscale data center in this Commonwealth.(2) The expansion of a data center that is not currently a hyperscale data center but, if expanded, would become a hyperscale data center.(3) Data center infrastructure such as new power generating facilities and utility transmission infrastructure required to power a hyperscale data center.(b) Duration.--The moratorium is in effect for 36 months from the effective date of this subsection.20260SB1359PN1770 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Prohibition.--The Commonwealth, a governmental agency and a political subdivision and public benefit corporation of the Commonwealth may not, regardless of when the application was or is received, accept an application, or issue a permit or approval based on an application, for the siting, construction or commencement of operation of a data center during the moratorium.Section 4. Enforcement.(a) Effect of noncompliance.--Action by a Commonwealth agency or municipality in violation of this act is void.(b) Attorney General.--The Attorney General of the Commonwealth may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enforce this act.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1359PN1770 - 3 - 123456789101112131415